Hawaii statutes.
[§587A-15] Duties, rights, and liability of
authorized agencies. (a) If an authorized agency has family supervision,
it has the following duties and rights, subject to such conditions or
restrictions as the court deems to be in the best interests of a child:

(1) Monitoring and supervising the child and the
child's family members who are parties. Monitoring and supervision shall
include reasonable access to each of the family members who are parties and
reasonable access into the child's family home; and

(2) Placement of the child in foster care and thereby
assuming temporary foster custody or foster custody of the child. The
authorized agency shall immediately notify the court when such placement
occurs. Upon notification, the court shall set the case for:

(A) A temporary foster custody hearing within
three days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays; or

(B) If jurisdiction has been established, a
periodic review hearing within ten days of the child's placement.

The temporary foster custody hearing or the
periodic review hearing may be held at a later date, only if the court finds it
to be in the best interests of the child.

(b) If an authorized agency has foster custody
it has the following duties and rights:

(1) Determining where and with whom the child shall
be placed in foster care; provided that the child shall not be placed in foster
care outside the State without prior order of the court;

(2) Permitting the child to return to the family from
which the child was removed, unless otherwise ordered by the court. The
child's return may occur only if no party objects to such placement and prior
written notice is given to the court and to all parties stating that there is
no objection of any party to the child's return. Upon the child's return to
the family, temporary foster custody or foster custody shall be automatically
revoked, and the child and the child's family members who are parties shall be
placed under temporary family supervision or the family supervision of the
authorized agency;

(3) Ensuring that the child is provided with adequate
food, clothing, shelter, psychological care, physical care, medical care,
supervision, and other necessities in a timely manner;

(4) Monitoring whether the child is being provided
with an appropriate education;

(5) Providing required consents for the child's
physical or psychological health or welfare, including ordinary medical,
dental, psychiatric, psychological, educational, employment, recreational, or
social needs;

(6) Providing consents for any other medical or
psychological care or treatment, including surgery, if the persons who are
otherwise authorized to provide consent are unable or unwilling to consent. Before
being provided to the child, this care or treatment shall be deemed necessary
for the child's physical or psychological health or welfare by two physicians
or two psychologists, as appropriate, who are licensed or authorized to
practice in the State;

(7) Providing consent for the child's application for
a driver's instructional permit, provisional driver's license, or driver's
license;

(8) Providing consent to the recording of a statement
pursuant to section 587A-21; and

(9) Providing the court with information concerning
the child.

The court, in its discretion, may vest foster
custody of a child in any authorized agency or subsequently authorized
agencies, if the court finds that it is in the child's best interests to do
so. The rights and duties that are so assumed by an authorized agency shall
supersede the rights and duties of any legal or permanent custodian of the
child.

(c) Unless otherwise provided in this section
or as otherwise ordered by the court, a child's family shall retain the
following rights and responsibilities after a transfer of temporary foster
custody or foster custody, to the extent that the family possessed the rights
and responsibilities prior to the transfer of temporary foster custody or
foster custody:

(1) The right of reasonable supervised or
unsupervised visitation at the discretion of the authorized agency or the
court;

(2) The right to consent to adoption, to marriage, or
to major medical or psychological care or treatment; and

(3) The continuing responsibility to support the
child, including repayment for the cost of any care, treatment, or other
service provided by the authorized agency or the court for the child's benefit.

(d) If an authorized agency has permanent
custody, it has the following duties and rights:

(1) Assuming the parental and custodial duties and
rights of a legal custodian and family member;

(2) Determining where and with whom the child shall
live; provided that the child shall not be placed outside the State without
prior order of the court;

(3) Ensuring that the child is provided with adequate
food, clothing, shelter, psychological care, physical care, medical care,
supervision, and other necessities in a timely manner;

(4) Monitoring whether the child is being provided
with an appropriate education;

(5) Providing all required consents for the child's
physical or psychological health or welfare, including medical, dental,
psychiatric, psychological, educational, employment, recreational, and social
needs;

(6) Providing consent for the child's application for
a driver's instructional permit, provisional driver's license, or driver's
license;

(7) Providing consent to adoption, change of name,
and marriage; and

(8) Submitting a written report to the court if the
child leaves the home of the permanent custodian for a period of seven
consecutive days or more. The report shall state the child's current situation
and shall be submitted on or before the tenth day, excluding Saturdays,
Sundays, and holidays, after the child leaves the home.

(e) An authorized agency shall not be liable
to third party persons for the acts of the child solely by reason of the
agency's status as foster custodian or permanent custodian of the child. [L
2010, c 135, pt of §1]

Case Notes

Department of human services does not have the discretion to
determine a child's permanent placement pursuant to, inter alia, subsection
(d)(2); subsection (d)(2) characterizes the department's permanent placement
authority as a "duty" and "right", but nowhere suggests
that the department may exercise that authority in its discretion. 130 H. 486
(App.), 312 P.3d 1193 (2013).

Family court did not err, as a matter of law, by denying
department of human services' request to be discharged as the child in
question's permanent custodian, after ordering the department not to place the
child with the child's maternal aunt; the Hawaii supreme court has never held
that where the family court rejects a department of human services placement
recommendation, the supreme court should revoke the department's custody. 130
H. 486 (App.), 312 P.3d 1193 (2013).

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next